Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Part 1 General Provisions [Effective January 1, 2023.]
7-13.1-121.
Service of process, notice, or demand. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership may be served with any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law by serving its registered agent.

If a limited partnership or registered foreign limited partnership fails to appoint or maintain a registered agent in this state, or whenever its registered agent cannot with reasonable diligence be found at the registered office, then the secretary of state is an agent of the corporation upon whom any process, notice, or demand may be served. Service on the secretary of state of any process, notice, or demand is made by delivering to and leaving with the secretary of state or with any clerk having charge of the corporation department of the office, duplicate copies of the process, notice, or demand. In the event any process, notice, or demand is served on the secretary of state, the secretary of state shall immediately forward one of the copies by certified mail, addressed to the corporation at its registered office. Any service upon the secretary of state is returnable in not less than thirty (30) days.

The secretary of state shall maintain a record of any such service setting forth the name of the plaintiff and defendant, the title, docket number and nature of the proceeding in which process has been served upon the secretary of state, the fact that service has been effected pursuant to this section, the return date thereof, and the day and hour when the service was made. The secretary of state shall not be required to retain such information for a period longer than five (5) years from receipt of the service of process.

Service of process, notice, or demand on a registered agent must be in a written record.

Service of process, notice, or demand may be made by other means under law other than this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-122.
Delivery of record. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, permissible means of delivery of a record include delivery by hand, mail, conventional commercial practice, and electronic transmission.

Delivery to the secretary of state is effective only when a record is received by the secretary of state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-123.
Fees for filing documents and issuing certificates. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The secretary of state shall charge and collect for:

Filing a certificate of limited partnership, one hundred dollars ($100);

Filing a certificate of amendment to a certificate of limited partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00);

Filing a certificate of correction to a certificate of limited partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00);

(3)

Filing a certificate of dissolution of a certificate of limited partnership, ten dollars ($10.00);

Filing an application to reserve a limited partnership name, fifty dollars ($50.00);

Filing a notice of transfer of a reserved limited partnership name, fifty dollars ($50.00);

Filing a statement of change of address of specified office or change of specified agent, twenty dollars ($20.00);

Filing a statement of change of address only for a specified agent, without fee;

Filing an application of a foreign limited partnership to register as a foreign limited partnership, one hundred dollars ($100);

Filing a certificate of withdrawal of registration as a foreign limited partnership, twenty-five dollars ($25.00);

Filing any other document, statement, or report of a domestic or foreign limited partnership, except an annual report, ten dollars ($10.00);

Filing a certificate of amendment of a foreign limited partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00);

An annual report of a domestic or foreign limited partnership, fifty dollars ($50.00);

To withdraw the certificate of revocation of a limited partnership, whether domestic or foreign, a penalty in the amount of fifty dollars ($50.00) for each year or part of the year that has elapsed since the issuance of the certificate of revocation;

For issuing a certificate of good standing/letter of status, twenty dollars ($20.00).

For issuing a certificate of fact, thirty dollars ($30.00);

For furnishing a certified copy of any document, instrument, or paper relating to a domestic or foreign limited partnership, a fee of fifteen cents ($.15) per page and ten dollars ($10.00) for the certificate and affirming the seal to it; and

Service of process on the secretary of state as registered agent of a limited partnership, fifteen dollars ($15.00) which amount may be recovered as a taxable cost by the party to the suit or action making the service if the party prevails in the suit or action.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-13.1-124.
Reservation of power to amend or repeal. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The general assembly of this state has power to amend or repeal all or part of this chapter at any time, and all limited partnerships and foreign limited partnerships subject to this chapter are governed by the amendment or repeal.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 121, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 122, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.